Washington statutes.
RCW 10.122.180

No right to electronic recording or transcript.

(1) This chapter does not create a right of an individual to require a custodial interrogation to be recorded electronically.

(2) This chapter does not require preparation of a transcript of an electronic recording of a custodial interrogation.

[ 2021 c 329 s 18.]